District of Columbia statutes.
3-1205.07

Reciprocity and endorsement.

(a)

For the purposes of this section, the term:

(1)

“Endorsement” means the process of issuing a license, registration, or certification to an applicant who is licensed, registered, certified, or accredited by an accrediting association or a state board and recognized by the Board as a qualified professional according to standards that were the substantial equivalent at the time of the licensing, registration, certification, or accreditation to the standards for that profession set forth in this chapter and who has continually remained in good standing with the licensing, registering, certifying, or accrediting association or state board from the date of licensure, registration, certification, or accreditation until the date of licensure, registration, or certification in the District.

(2)

“Reciprocity” means the process of issuing a license, registration, or certification to an applicant who is licensed, registered, or certified and in good standing under the laws of another state with requirements that, in the opinion of the Board, were substantially equivalent at the time of licensure, registration, or certification to the requirements of this chapter, and that state admits health professionals licensed, registered, or certified in the District of Columbia in a like manner.

(b)

Each board shall issue a license, registration, or certification to an applicant who qualifies by reciprocity or endorsement and who pays the applicable fees established by the Mayor.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 507, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-247, § 2(m), 42 DCR 457
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 403, 45 DCR 1172
July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-26, § 2(e)(7), 56 DCR 4043
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 30(b)(1), 59 DCR 6190
This section is referenced in § 3-1205.06.
1981 Ed., § 2-3305.7.
D.C. Law 18-26 rewrote the section.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e)(7) of Health Occupations Revision General Amendment Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-146, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6308).